Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-361
Living independently, defined.

Living independently shall include, but not be limited to, using the telephone, shopping, preparing food, housekeeping, and administering medications.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 14.